District of Columbia statutes.
1-1061.11

Federal write-in absentee ballot.

A covered voter may use a federal write-in absentee ballot to vote for all offices and ballot measures in an election described in § 1-1061.03.

June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-137, § 111, 59 DCR 2542
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 11 of the Uniform Military and Overseas Voters Act.